Illinois, session 104th, HB4844.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Jury Act is amended by changing Section 4.1 5as follows: 6    (705 ILCS 305/4.1)  (from Ch. 78, par. 4.1)7    Sec. 4.1. Jury duty; notice to employer; right to time 8off. 9    (a) Any person who is not legally disqualified to serve on 10juries, and has been duly summoned for jury duty for either 11petit or grand jury service, shall be given time off from 12employment to serve upon the jury for which such employee is 13summoned, regardless of the employment shift such employee is 14assigned to at the time of service of such summons. An employee 15shall give his employer reasonable notice of required jury 16service. An employer may not deny an employee time off for jury 17duty because such employee is then assigned to work a night 18shift of employment, that is, an employer cannot require a 19night shift worker to work while such employee is doing jury 20duty in the daytime.21    (b) No employer shall discharge, threaten to discharge, 22intimidate or coerce any employee by reason of the employee's 23jury service, or the attendance or scheduled attendance in   HB4844 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 17822 JRC 31256 b1connection with such service, in any court of this State.2    (c) If an employee gives reasonable notice of required 3jury service, any employer who violates the provisions of this 4Section: 5        (1) may be charged with contempt of court. In such an 6    event, the State's Attorney shall file a petition for 7    civil contempt, criminal contempt, or both, against the 8    employer to be prosecuted by the State's Attorney; and 9        (2) shall be liable for damages for any loss of wages 10    or other benefits suffered by an employee by reason of the 11    violation; and 12        (3) may be enjoined from further violations of this 13    Section and ordered to reinstate any employee discharged 14    by reason of jury service.15    As used in this Section, "reasonable notice of required 16jury service" means that the employee summoned for jury duty 17must deliver to the employer a copy of the summons within 10 18days of the date of issuance of the summons to the employee.19    (d) Any individual who is reinstated to a position of 20employment in accordance with this Section shall be considered 21as having been on furlough or leave of absence during his 22period of jury service, shall be reinstated to his position of 23employment without loss of seniority, and shall be entitled to 24participate in insurance or other benefits offered by the 25employer under established rules and practices relating to 26employees on furlough or leave of absence in effect with the   HB4844 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 17822 JRC 31256 b1employer at the time the individual entered upon jury service.2    (e) In any action or proceeding under this Section, the 3court may award a prevailing employee who brings the action by 4retained counsel a reasonable attorney's fee.5    (f) Any right or remedy provided in this Section is in 6addition to any right or remedy otherwise provided by law to an 7employee.8    (g) Employers shall be required to compensate an employee 9at their regular rate of pay for time serving on jury duty No 10employer shall be obligated to compensate an employee for time 11taken off for jury duty. The requirements of this subsection 12do not apply to employers with 25 or fewer employees. 13    (h) The official responsible for issuing the summons may 14advise the juror of his rights under this Act by printed insert 15with the summons or on the summons itself.16(Source: P.A. 86-1395; 87-616.) 17    Section 10. The Jury Commission Act is amended by changing 18Section 10.1 as follows: 19    (705 ILCS 310/10.1)  (from Ch. 78, par. 33.1)20    Sec. 10.1. Jury duty, notice to employer, right to time 21off. (a) Any person who is not legally disqualified to serve on 22juries, and has been duly summoned for jury duty for either 23petit or grand jury service, shall be given time off from 24employment to serve upon the jury for which such employee is   HB4844 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 17822 JRC 31256 b1summoned, regardless of the employment shift such employee is 2assigned to at the time of service of such summons. An employee 3shall give his employer reasonable notice of required jury 4service. An employer may not deny an employee time off for jury 5duty because such employee is then assigned to work a night 6shift of employment, that is, an employer cannot require a 7night shift worker to work while such employee is doing jury 8duty in the daytime.9    (b) No employer shall discharge, threaten to discharge, 10intimidate or coerce any employee by reason of the employee's 11jury service, or the attendance or scheduled attendance in 12connection with such service, in any court of this State.13    (c) If an employee gives reasonable notice of required 14jury service, any employer who violates the provisions of this 15Section: 16        (1) may be charged with contempt of court. In such an 17    event, the State's Attorney shall file a petition for 18    civil contempt, criminal contempt, or both, against the 19    employer to be prosecuted by the State's Attorney; and 20        (2) shall be liable for damages for any loss of wages 21    or other benefits suffered by an employee by reason of the 22    violation; and 23        (3) may be enjoined from further violations of this 24    Section and ordered to reinstate any employee discharged 25    by reason of jury service.26    As used in this Section, "reasonable notice of required   HB4844 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 17822 JRC 31256 b1jury service" means that the employee summoned for jury duty 2must deliver to the employer a copy of the summons within 10 3days of the date of issuance of the summons to the employee.4    (d) Any individual who is reinstated to a position of 5employment in accordance with this Section shall be considered 6as having been on furlough or leave of absence during his 7period of jury service, shall be reinstated to his position of 8employment without loss of seniority, and shall be entitled to 9participate in insurance or other benefits offered by the 10employer under established rules and practices relating to 11employees on furlough or leave of absence in effect with the 12employer at the time the individual entered upon jury service.13    (e) In any action or proceeding under this Section, the 14court may award a prevailing employee who brings the action by 15retained counsel a reasonable attorney's fee.16    (f) Any right or remedy provided in this Section is in 17addition to any right or remedy otherwise provided by law to an 18employee.19    (g) Employers are required to compensate employees at the 20employee's regular rate of pay for time that the employee 21served on jury duty No employer shall be obligated to 22compensate an employee for time taken off for jury duty. The 23requirements of this subsection do not apply to employers with 2425 or fewer employees. 25    (h) The official responsible for issuing the summons may 26advise the juror of his rights under this Act by printed insert   HB4844 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 17822 JRC 31256 b1with the summons or on the summons itself.2(Source: P.A. 86-1395; 87-616.)